Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.034

Central Washington University—Student teacher remote supervision.

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, Central Washington University shall acquire the necessary audiovisual technology and equipment for university faculty to remotely supervise student teachers in ten schools.

(2) A school selected for the purposes of remote supervision of student teachers under this section must be a rural public school that currently is unable to have student teachers from Central Washington University's teacher preparation program due to its geographic location.

[ 2019 c 295 s 205.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28A.310.235.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28B.10.033.

Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28B.102.030.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.415.265.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.180.120.